Maryland, session 2025, HB0593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
13–517.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Automated external defibrillator (AED)” means a medical heart
monitor and defibrillator device that:
(i) Is cleared for market by the federal Food and Drug
Administration;
(ii) Recognizes the presence or absence of ventricular fibrillation or
rapid ventricular tachycardia;
(iii) Determines, without intervention by an operator, whether
defibrillation should be performed;
(iv) On determining that defibrillation should be performed,
automatically charges; and
(v) 1. Requires operator intervention to deliver the electrical
impulse; or
2. Automatically continues with delivery of electrical impulse.

HOUSE BILL 593 3
13–517.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Automated external defibrillator (AED)” means a medical heart
monitor and defibrillator device that:
(i) Is cleared for market by the federal Food and Drug
Administration;
(ii) Recognizes the presence or absence of ventricular fibrillation or
rapid ventricular tachycardia;
(iii) Determines, without intervention by an operator, whether
defibrillation should be performed;
(iv) On determining that defibrillation should be performed,
automatically charges; and
(v) 1. Requires operator intervention to deliver the electrical
impulse; or
2. Automatically continues with delivery of electrical
impulse.
(3) “Certificate” means a certificate issued by the EMS Board to a
registered facility.
(4) (i) “Facility” means an agency, an association, a corporation, a firm,
a partnership, or any other entity.
(ii) “Facility” does not include [a]:
1. A grocery store or restaurant that is subject to §
21–330.3 of the Health – General Article; OR
2. A LIBRARY THAT IS SUBJECT TO § 23–102.2 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(5) “Jurisdictional emergency medical services operational program”
means the institution, agency, corporation, or other entity that has been approved by the
EMS Board to provide oversight of emergency medical services for each of the local
government and State and federal emergency medical services programs.
(6) “Program” means the Public Access Automated External Defibrillator
Program.

HOUSE BILL 593
(7) “Regional administrator” means the individual employed by the
Institute as regional administrator in each EMS region.
(8) “Regional council” means an EMS advisory body as created by the Code
of Maryland Regulations 30.05.
(9) “Regional council AED committee” means a committee appointed by the
regional council consisting of:
(i) The regional medical director;
(ii) The regional administrator; and
(iii) Three or more individuals with knowledge of and expertise in
AEDs.
(10) “Registered facility” means an organization, a business association, an
agency, or any other entity that meets the requirements of the EMS Board for registering
with the Program.
23–102.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR (AED)” MEANS A HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 13–517 OF THIS ARTICLE. MEDICAL HEART MONITOR AND
DEFIBRILLATOR DEVICE THAT:
(I) IS CLEARED FOR MARKET BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND
DRUG ADMINISTRATION;
(II) RECOGNIZES THE PRESENCE OR ABSENCE OF
VENTRICULAR FIBRILLATION OR RAPID VENTRICULAR TACHYCARDIA;
(III) DETERMINES, WITHOUT INTERVENTION BY AN OPERATOR,
WHETHER DEFIBRILLATION SHOULD BE PERFORMED;
(IV) ON DETERMINING THAT DEFIBRILLATION SHOULD BE
PERFORMED, AUTOMATICALLY CHARGES; AND
(V) 1. REQUIRES OPERATOR INTERVENTION TO DELIVER
THE ELECTRICAL IMPULSE; OR

HOUSE BILL 593 5
2. AUTOMATICALLY CONTINUES WITH DELIVERY OF THE
ELECTRICAL IMPULSE.
(3) (I) “LIBRARY” INCLUDES:
1. THE STATE LIBRARY RESOURCE CENTER;
2. A REGIONAL RESOURCE CENTER;
3. A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY LIBRARY;
4. A COUNTY LIBRARY SYSTEM AND THE ENOCH PRATT
FREE LIBRARY IN BALTIMORE;
5. THE MARYLAND STATE LIBRARY FOR THE BLIND
AND PRINT DISABLED;
6. THE MARYLAND DEAF CULTURE DIGITAL LIBRARY;
AND
7. A METROPOLITAN COOPERATIVE SERVICE PROGRAM
MEANS:
1. EACH BRANCH OF A COUNTY LIBRARY SYSTEM; OR
2. THE ENOCH PRATT FREE LIBRARY.
(II) “LIBRARY” DOES NOT INCLUDE A:
1. A SCHOOL LIBRARY MEDIA PROGRAM ESTABLISHED
BY A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM; OR
2. A MOBILE LIBRARY UNIT; OR
3. A CORRECTIONAL FACILITY LIBRARY.
(B) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2026, EACH OPERATOR OF A EACH LIBRARY
SHALL:
(1) PLACE AN AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR IN A
PROMINENT AREA, ACCESSIBLE TO EMPLOYEES AND LIBRARY USERS;
(2) COMPLY WITH § 13–517 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 593
(2) (3) MAINTAIN THE FUNCTIONALITY OF THE AUTOMATED
EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR; AND
(3) ENSURE THAT AN INDIVIDUAL TRAINED IN THE OPERATION OF
THE AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR IS PRESENT AT ANY TIME DURING
WHICH THE LIBRARY IS OPEN TO USE.
(C) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER IMMUNITIES AVAILABLE UNDER
STATUTORY OR COMMON LAW:
(1) A LIBRARY IS NOT CIVILLY LIABLE FOR ANY ACT OR OMISSION IN
THE PROVISION OF AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATION IF THE LIBRARY HAS
SATISFIED THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL IS NOT CIVILLY LIABLE FOR ANY ACT OR
OMISSION IF:
(I) THE INDIVIDUAL IS ACTING IN GOOD FAITH WHILE
RENDERING AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATION TO ANOTHER INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS THE VICTIM OR IS REASONABLY BELIEVED BY THE INDIVIDUAL TO BE A
VICTIM OF A SUDDEN CARDIAC ARREST;
(II) THE ASSISTANCE OR AID IS PROVIDED IN A REASONABLY
PRUDENT MANNER; AND
(III) THE AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATION IS PROVIDED
WITHOUT FEE OR OTHER COMPENSATION; AND
(3) A LIBRARY OR INDIVIDUAL IS NOT CIVILLY LIABLE FOR FAILING
TO RENDER AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATION TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A
VICTIM OR IS REASONABLY BELIEVED TO BE A VICTIM OF A SUDDEN CARDIAC
ARREST.
(D) THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND THE MARYLAND
INSTITUTE FOR EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SYSTEMS JOINTLY SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) ESTABLISH GUIDELINES FOR PERIODIC INSPECTIONS AND
ANNUAL MAINTENANCE OF THE AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATORS;
(2) ASSIST THE OPERATOR OF A LIBRARY IN CARRYING OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 593 7
(3) REQUIRE EACH LIBRARY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION TO REGISTER
WITH THE MARYLAND INSTITUTE FOR EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SYSTEMS
IN ORDER TO:
(I) MAKE ITS LOCATION PUBLICLY AVAILABLE TO EMERGENCY
DISPATCHERS; AND
(II) RECEIVE MAINTENANCE AND RECALL NOTICES FROM THE
MARYLAND INSTITUTE FOR EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES SYSTEMS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026, the Maryland Institute for Emergency Medical Services Systems shall report to the
Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House Economic
Matters Ways and Means Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, on:
(1) the libraries that registered automated external defibrillators in
accordance with regulations adopted under § 23–102.2 of the Education Article, as enacted
by Section 1 of this Act; and
(2) the number of adverse cardiac events that required the use of an
automated external defibrillator experienced in the libraries that registered the automated
external defibrillators.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.